Arkansas, session 2025, HB1846.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. Arkansas 2036
Commission — Creation — Purpose — Members.
(a) There is created the Arkansas 2036 Commission.
(b) The purpose of the commission is to:
(1) Promote a suitable statewide observance of the two hundredth
birthday of Arkansas;
(2) Explore the possible construction of a commemorative landmark
that promotes tourism to the state;
(3) Cooperate and assist the Division of Arkansas Heritage with
programs commemorating the two hundredth birthday of the state; and
(4) Provide assistance for the development of programs,
projects, and activities promoting the history and heritage of the state.
(c) The commission shall consist of eight (8) members to include:
(1) The Director of the Division of Arkansas Heritage or his or
her designee;
(2) The Secretary of the Department of Education or his or her
designee;
(3) Two (2) members appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives;
*LGL077*
04-10-2025 15:39:29 LGL077

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 S4/10/25 HB1846
(4) Two (2) members appointed by the President Pro Tempore of
the Senate; and
(5) Two (2) members appointed by the Governor.
(d)(1) The director or his or her designee shall serve as the chair of
the commission.
(2) The director or his or her designee shall call the first
meeting of the commission within thirty (30) days of the effective date of
this act.
(3) Meetings shall be held at the call of the chair.
(e)(1) Members of the commission shall serve at the pleasure of the
appointing entity.
(2) The terms of all members of the commission shall expire on
December 31, 2036.
(3) If a vacancy occurs on the commission, the vacancy shall be
filled by the same process as the original appointment.
(f) The commission shall establish rules and procedures for conducting
its business.
(g) Members of the commission shall serve without compensation.
(h) A majority of the members of the commission shall constitute a
quorum for transacting any business of the commission.
(i) The division shall provide staff for the commission.
(j) The commission shall expire on December 31, 2036.

/s/S. Meeks












04-10-2025 15:39:29 LGL077